test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-aaja_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - ája: # N_ODD_OPEN (with CG)
    ája+N+Sg+Nom: ája
    ája+N+Sg+Gen: ádjaga
    ája+N+Sg+Acc: ádjagav
    ája+N+Sg+Ill: ádjagij
    ája+N+Sg+Ine: ádjagin
    ája+N+Sg+Ela: [ádjagist, ádjagis]
    ája+N+Sg+Com: ádjagijn
    ája+N+Pl+Nom: ádjaga
    ája+N+Pl+Gen: ádjagij
    ája+N+Pl+Acc: ádjagijd
    ája+N+Pl+Ill: ádjagijda
    ája+N+Pl+Ine: ádjagijn
    ája+N+Pl+Ela: [ádjagijst, ádjagijs]
    ája+N+Pl+Com: [ádjagij, ádjagijgum]
    ája+N+Ess: ádjagin
    ája+N+Abe: ádjagahtá

 
 
